Utah statutes.
31A-28-108.   Powers and duties of the association.
(1) (a)  If a member insurer is an impaired insurer, subject to any conditions
imposed by the association that do not impair the contractual obligations of
the impaired insurer, the association may provide the protections provided by
this part.
(b)  If the association makes the election described in Subsection (1)(a), the
association may proceed under one or more of the options described in
Subsection (3).
(2)  If a member insurer is an insolvent insurer, the association shall
provide the protections provided by this part by electing in its discretion to
proceed under one or more of the options in Subsection (3).
(3)  With respect to the covered portions of covered policies of an impaired
or insolvent insurer, the association may:
(a) (i) (A)  guaranty, assume, or reinsure, or cause to be guaranteed,
assumed, or reinsured, the policies or contracts of the insurer; or
(B)  assure payment of the contractual obligations of the insolvent insurer;
and
(ii)  provide the money, pledges, guarantees, or other means as are reasonably
necessary to discharge such duties; or
(b)  provide benefits and coverages in accordance with Subsection (4).
(4) (a)  In accordance with Subsection (3)(b), the association may:
(i)  assure payment of benefits for premiums identical to the premiums and
benefits, except for terms of conversion and renewability, that would have
been payable under the policies or contracts of the insurer, for claims
incurred:
(A)  with respect to group policies:
(I)  not later than the earlier of the next renewal date under the policies or
contracts or 45 days after the coverage date; and
(II)  in no event less than 30 days after the coverage date; or
(B)  with respect to nongroup policies or contracts:
(I)  not later than the earlier of the next renewal date, if any, under the
policies or contracts or one year from the coverage date; and
(II)  in no event less than 30 days from the coverage date;
(ii)  make diligent efforts to notify the following 30 days before any
termination of the benefits that are provided under a policy or contract of
the insurer:
(A)  the known insureds or annuitants for nongroup policies and contracts;
(B)  owners if other than an insured or annuitant; or
(C)  group policy owners for group policies and contracts; and
(iii)  with respect to nongroup life and accident and health insurance
policies and annuities, make available substitute coverage on an individual
basis, in accordance with Subsection (4)(b), to each known insured, annuitant,
or owner and to each individual formerly insured or formerly an annuitant
under a group policy who is not eligible for replacement group coverage on an
individual basis in accordance with Subsection (4)(b), if the insured or
annuitant had a right under law or the terminated policy or annuity contract
to:
(A)  convert coverage to individual coverage; or
(B)  continue an individual policy in force until a specified age or for a
specified time during which the insurer had:
(I)  no right unilaterally to make changes in any provision of the policy; or
(II)  a right only to make changes in premium by class.
(b) (i)  In providing the substitute coverage required under Subsection
(4)(a)(iii), the association may offer to:
(A)  reissue the terminated coverage; or
(B)  issue an alternative policy.
(ii)  An alternative or reissued policy under Subsection (4)(b)(i):
(A)  shall be offered without requiring evidence of insurability; and
(B)  may not provide for any waiting period or exclusion that would not have
applied under the terminated policy.
(iii)  The association may reinsure an alternative or reissued policy.
(c) (i)  An alternative policy adopted by the association is subject to the
approval of the commissioner.
(ii)  The association may adopt alternative policies of various types for
future issuance without regard to any particular impairment or insolvency.
(iii)  An alternative policy:
(A)  shall contain at least the minimum statutory provisions required in this
state; and
(B)  provide benefits that are not unreasonable in relation to the premium
charged.
(iv)  The association shall set the premium for an alternative policy in
accordance with a table of rates that the association adopts.  The premium
shall reflect:
(A)  the amount of insurance to be provided; and
(B)  the age and class of risk of each insured.
(v)  For an alternative policy issued under an individual policy of the
impaired or insolvent insurer:
(A)  age shall be determined in accordance with the original policy
provisions; and
(B)  class of risk is the class of risk under the original policy.
(vi)  For an alternative policy issued to individuals insured under a group
policy:
(A)  age and class of risk shall be determined by the association in
accordance with the alternative policy provisions and risk classification
standards approved by the commissioner; and
(B)  the premium may not reflect any changes in the health of the insured
after the original policy was last underwritten.
(vii)  An alternative policy issued by the association shall provide coverage
of a type similar to that of the policy issued by the impaired or insolvent
insurer, as determined by the association.
(d)  If the association elects to reissue terminated coverage at a premium
rate different from that charged under the terminated policy, the association
shall set the premium in accordance with the amount of insurance provided and
the age and class of risk, subject to the approval of the commissioner or by a
court of competent jurisdiction.
(e)  The association's obligations with respect to coverage under any policy
of the impaired or insolvent insurer or under any reissued or alternative
policy ceases on the date the coverage or policy is replaced by another
similar policy by:
(i)  the owner;
(ii)  the insured; or
(iii)  the association.
(f) (i)  With respect to a claim unpaid as of the coverage date and a claim
incurred during the period defined in Subsection (4)(a)(i), a provider of
health care services, by accepting a payment from the association upon a claim
of the provider against an insured whose health care insurer is an insolvent
member insurer, agrees to forgive the insured of 20% of the debt which
otherwise would be paid by the insurer had it not been insolvent, subject to a
maximum of $8,000 being required to be forgiven by any one provider as to each
claimant.
(ii)  The obligations of a solvent insurer to pay all or part of the covered
claim are not diminished by the forgiveness provided for in this section.
(5)  When proceeding under Subsection (3)(b) with respect to any policy or
contract carrying guaranteed minimum interest rates, the association shall
assure the payment or crediting of a rate of interest consistent with
Subsection 31A-28-103(2)(b)(iii).
(6)  Nonpayment of premiums within 31 days after the date required under the
terms of any guaranteed, assumed, alternative, or reissued policy or contract
or substitute coverage terminates the association's obligations under the
policy or coverage under this part with respect to the policy or coverage,
except with respect to any claims incurred or any net cash surrender value
that may be due in accordance with this part.
(7) (a)  Premium due after the coverage date with respect to the covered
portion of a policy or contract of an impaired or insolvent insurer belongs to
and is payable at the direction of the association.  If a liquidator of an
insolvent insurer requests the report, the association shall report to the
liquidator the premium collected by the association.
(b)  The association is liable to a policy or contract owner for unearned
premiums due to the policy or contract owner arising after the coverage date
with respect to the covered portion of the policy or contract.
(8)  The protection provided by this part does not apply if any guaranty
protection is provided to residents of this state by laws of the domiciliary
state or jurisdiction of the impaired or insolvent insurer other than this
state.
(9)  In carrying out its duties under Subsection (2), and subject to approval
by a court in this state, the association may:
(a)  impose permanent policy or contract liens in connection with a guarantee,
assumption, or reinsurance agreement, if the association finds that:
(i)  the amounts that can be assessed under this part are less than the
amounts needed to assure full and prompt performance of the association's
duties under this part; or
(ii)  the economic or financial conditions as they affect member insurers are
sufficiently adverse to render the imposition of the permanent policy or
contract liens to be in the public interest;
(b)  impose temporary moratoriums or liens on payments of cash values and
policy loans, or any other right to withdraw funds held in conjunction with
policies or contracts, in addition to any contractual provisions for deferral
of cash or policy loan value; and
(c)  if the receivership court imposes a temporary moratorium or moratorium
charge on payment of cash values or policy loans, or on any other right to
withdraw funds held in conjunction with policies or contracts, out of the
assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer, defer the payment of cash values,
policy loans, or other rights by the association for the period of the
moratorium or moratorium charge imposed by the receivership court, except for
claims covered by the association to be paid in accordance with a hardship
procedure:
(i)  established by the receiver; and
(ii)  approved by the receivership court.
(10) (a)  A special deposit in this state held pursuant to law or required by
the commissioner for the benefit of creditors, including policy owners, that
is not turned over to the domiciliary receiver upon the entry of a final order
of liquidation or order approving a rehabilitation plan of an insurer
domiciled in any state shall be promptly paid to the association.
(b)  Any amount paid under Subsection (10)(a) to the association less the
amount retained by the association shall be treated as a distribution of
estate assets pursuant to Sections 31A-27a-601, 31A-27a-602, and 31A-27a-701.
(11)  If the association fails to act within a reasonable period of time as
provided in this section, the commissioner has the powers and duties of the
association under this part with respect to an impaired or insolvent insurer.
(12)  The association may assist or advise the commissioner, upon the
commissioner's request, concerning:
(a)  rehabilitation;
(b)  payment of claims;
(c)  continuance of coverage; or
(d)  the performance of other contractual obligations of any impaired or
insolvent insurer.
(13) (a)  The association has standing to appear or intervene before a court
or agency in this state with jurisdiction over:
(i)  an impaired or insolvent insurer concerning which the association is or
may become obligated under this part; or
(ii)  any person or property against which the association may have rights
through subrogation or otherwise.
(b)  The standing referred to in Subsection (13)(a) extends to all matters
germane to the powers and duties of the association, including:
(i)  proposals for reinsuring, modifying, or guaranteeing the policies or
contracts of the impaired or insolvent insurer; and
(ii)  the determination of the policies or contracts and contractual
obligations.
(c)  The association has the right to appear or intervene before a court in
another state with jurisdiction over:
(i)  an impaired or insolvent insurer for which the association is or may
become obligated; or
(ii)  any person or property against which the association may have rights
through subrogation of the insurer's policyowners.
(14) (a)  A person receiving benefits under this part is considered to have
assigned the rights under, and any causes of action against any person for
losses arising under, resulting from, or otherwise relating to the covered
policy or contract to the association to the extent of the benefits received
because of this part, whether the benefits are payments of, or on account of:
(i)  contractual obligations;
(ii)  continuation of coverage; or
(iii)  provision of substitute or alternative coverages.
(b)  As a condition precedent to the receipt of any right or benefits
conferred by this part upon that person, the association may require an
assignment to it of the rights and causes of action described in Subsection
(14)(a) by any:
(i)  payee;
(ii)  policy or contract owner;
(iii)  beneficiary;
(iv)  insured; or
(v)  annuitant.
(c)  The subrogation rights obtained by the association under this Subsection
(14) have the same priority against the assets of the impaired or insolvent
insurer as that possessed by the person entitled to receive benefits under
this part.
(d)  In addition to Subsections (14)(a) through (c), the association has the
common law rights of subrogation and any other equitable or legal remedy that
would have been available to the impaired or insolvent insurer or owner,
beneficiary, or payee of a policy or contract with respect to the policy or
contract, including in the case of a structured settlement annuity any rights
of the owner, beneficiary, or payee of the annuity to the extent of benefits
received pursuant to this part against a person originally or by succession
responsible for the losses arising from the personal injury relating to the
annuity or payment of the annuity.
(e)  If a provision of this Subsection (14) is invalid or ineffective with
respect to a person or claim for any reason, the amount payable by the
association with respect to the related covered obligations shall be reduced
by the amount realized by any other person with respect to the person or claim
that is attributable to the policies, or portion of the policies, covered by
the association.
(f)  If the association has provided benefits with respect to a covered policy
and a person recovers amounts as to which the association has rights as
described in this Subsection (14), the person shall pay to the association the
portion of the recovery attributable to the covered policies.
(15) (a)  In addition to the rights and powers elsewhere in this part, the
association may:
(i)  enter into a contract that is necessary or proper to carry out the
provisions and purposes of this part;
(ii)  sue or be sued, including taking any legal actions necessary or proper
to:
(A)  recover any unpaid assessments under Section 31A-28-109; and
(B)  settle claims or potential claims against the association;
(iii)  borrow money to effect the purposes of this part;
(iv)  employ or retain the persons necessary or the appropriate staff members
to:
(A)  handle the financial transactions of the association; and
(B)  perform other functions as become necessary or proper under this part;
(v)  take necessary or appropriate legal action to avoid or recover payment of
improper claims;
(vi)  exercise, for the purposes of this part and to the extent approved by
the commissioner, the powers of a domestic life or health insurer, but in no
case may the association issue insurance policies or annuity contracts other
than those issued to perform its obligation under this part;
(vii)  request information from a person seeking coverage from the association
to aid the association in determining the association's obligations under this
part with respect to the person;
(viii)  take other necessary or appropriate action to discharge the
association's duties and obligations under this part or to exercise the
association's powers under this part; and
(ix)  act as a special deputy receiver if appointed by the commissioner.
(b)  Any note or other evidence of indebtedness of the association under
Subsection (15)(a)(iii) that is not in default:
(i)  is a legal investment for a domestic insurer; and
(ii)  may be carried as admitted assets.
(c)  A person seeking coverage from the association shall promptly comply with
a request for information by the association under Subsection (15)(a)(vii).
(16)  The association may join an organization of one or more other state
associations of similar purposes to further the purposes and administer the
powers and duties of the association.
(17) (a)  At any time within 180 days after the coverage date, the association
may elect to succeed to the rights and obligations of the member insurer that:
(i)  accrue on or after the coverage date; and
(ii)  relate to covered policies under any one or more indemnity reinsurance
agreements:
(A)  entered into by the member insurer as a ceding insurer and its reinsurer;
and
(B)  selected by the association.
(b)  An election made pursuant to Subsection (17)(a) is effective as of the
date of the order of liquidation.
(c)  The association may make an election described in Subsection (17)(a) by
notifying an affected reinsurer in writing, with verification of receipt,
through:
(i)  the association; or
(ii)  a nationally recognized association representing state guaranty
associations that is approved by the commissioner, that provides notice on
behalf of the association.
(d)  The association shall provide a copy of the notice described in
Subsection (17)(c) to the receiver.
(e) (i)  The receiver of an insolvent insurer and each reinsurer of the ceding
member insurers shall make available as soon as possible after commencement of
formal delinquency proceedings the information described in Subsection
(17)(e)(ii) to:
(A)  the association; or
(B)  a nationally recognized association representing state guaranty
associations that is approved by the commissioner, on behalf of the
association.
(ii)  This Subsection (17)(e) applies to:
(A)  copies of in-force contracts of reinsurance and the related records
relevant to the determination of whether the in-force contracts of reinsurance
should be assumed;
(B)  notices of any default under a reinsurance contract; or
(C)  any known event or condition that with the passage of time could become a
default under a reinsurance contract.
(f)  If the association makes an election under Subsection (17)(a), the
association shall comply with Subsections (17)(f)(i) through (vii) with
respect to the agreements selected by the association.
(i)  For a contract covered, in whole or in part, by the association, the
association is responsible for:
(A)  the unpaid premiums due under the agreements for periods both before and
after the coverage date; and
(B)  the performance of the other obligations to be performed after the
coverage date.
(ii)  The association may charge a contract covered in part by the association
the costs for reinsurance in excess of the obligations of the association,
through reasonable allocation methods.
(iii)  The association shall provide notice and an accounting to the receiver
of a charge made pursuant to Subsection (17)(f)(ii).
(iv)  The association is entitled to any amounts payable by the reinsurer
under the agreements with respect to a loss or event that:
(A)  occurs after the coverage date; and
(B)  relates to a contract covered by the association, in whole or in part.
(v)  On receipt of any amounts under Subsection (17)(f)(iv), the association
shall pay to the beneficiary under the policy or contract on account of which
the amounts were paid an amount equal to the lesser of:
(A)  the amount received by the association; and
(B)  the excess of the amount received by the association over the benefits
paid or payable by the association on account of the policy or contract less
the retention of the insurer applicable to the loss or event.
(vi) (A)  Within 30 days following the association's election, the association
and each indemnity reinsurer shall calculate the net balance due to or from
the association under each reinsurance agreement as of the date of the
association's election, giving full credit to the items paid by either the
member insurer, its receiver, or the indemnity reinsurer before the date of
the association's election.
(B)  Within five days of the completion of the calculation under Subsection
(17)(f)(vi)(A):
(I)  the reinsurer shall pay the receiver the amounts due for a loss or event
before the coverage date, subject to any set-off for premiums unpaid for a
period before the coverage date; and
(II)  the association or the reinsurer shall pay any remaining balance due the
other.
(C)  A dispute over an amount due to either party shall be resolved:
(I)  by arbitration pursuant to the terms of the affected reinsurance
contract; or
(II)  if the reinsurance contract contains no arbitration clause, as otherwise
provided by law.
(D)  If the receiver receives an amount due the association pursuant to
Subsection (17)(f)(iv), the receiver shall remit that amount to the
association as promptly as practicable.
(vii)  If the association, or the receiver on behalf of the association,
within 60 days of the election, pays the premiums due for periods both before
and after the coverage date that relate to contracts covered by the
association, in whole or in part, the reinsurer may not:
(A)  terminate the reinsurance agreement for failure to pay premium, to the
extent the reinsurance agreement relates to a policy or contract covered by
the association, in whole or in part; and
(B)  set off against amounts due the association an amount due:
(I)  under another contract; or
(II)  as an unpaid amount due from a person other than the association.
(g) (i)  This Subsection (17)(g) applies during the period that:
(A)  begins on the coverage date; and
(B)  ends:
(I)  on the election date; or
(II)  if no election date occurs, 180 days after the coverage date.
(ii)  During the period described in Subsection (17)(g)(i):
(A)  neither the association nor the reinsurer have a right or obligation
under a reinsurance contract that the association may assume under Subsection
(17)(a), whether for a period before or after the coverage date; and
(B)  the reinsurer, the receiver, and the association, to the extent
practicable, shall provide each other data and records reasonably requested.
(iii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (17)(g)(ii), once the association elects to
assume a reinsurance contract, the parties' rights and obligations are
governed by Subsections (17)(f)(i) through (vi).
(h)  If the association does not elect to assume a reinsurance contract by the
election date pursuant to Subsection (17)(a), the association has no right or
obligation with respect to the reinsurance contract, whether for a period
before or after the coverage date.
(i)  An insurer other than the association succeeds to the rights and
obligations of the association under Subsections (17)(a) through (f) effective
as of the date agreed upon by the association and the other insurer and
regardless of whether the association has made the election referred to in
Subsections (17)(a) through (f) provided that:
(i)  the association transfers its obligations to the other insurer;
(ii)  the association and the other insurer agree to the transfer;
(iii)  the indemnity reinsurance agreements automatically terminate for new
reinsurance unless the indemnity reinsurer and the other insurer agree to the
contrary;
(iv)  the obligations described in Subsection (17)(f)(v) may not apply on and
after the date the indemnity reinsurance agreement is transferred to the third
party insurer;
(v)  the transferring party shall give notice in writing, with verification of
receipt, to the affected reinsurer not less than 30 days before the effective
date of the transfer; and
(vi)  this Subsection (17)(i) may not apply if the association has previously
expressly determined in writing that the association will not exercise the
election referred to in Subsections (17)(a) through (f).
(j) (i)  This Subsection (17) supersedes the provisions of any law of this
state or of any affected reinsurance agreement that provides for or requires
any payment of reinsurance proceeds on account of losses or events that occur
in periods after the coverage date, to:
(A)  the receiver of an insolvent member insurer; or
(B)  another person.
(ii)  The receiver is entitled to any amounts payable by the reinsurer under
the reinsurance agreement with respect to a loss or event that occurs before
the coverage date, subject to applicable setoff provisions.
(k)  Except as otherwise expressly provided in Subsections (17)(a) through
(j), this Subsection (17) does not:
(i)  alter or modify the terms and conditions of a reinsurance agreement of
the insolvent member insurer;
(ii)  abrogate or limit a right any reinsurer to claim that it is entitled to
rescind a reinsurance agreement;
(iii)  give a policy owner or beneficiary an independent cause of action
against a reinsurer that is not otherwise set forth in the reinsurance
agreement;
(iv)  limit or affect the association's rights as a creditor of the estate of
an insolvent insurer against the assets of the estate; or
(v)  apply to a reinsurance agreement that covers property or casualty risks.
(18)  The board of directors of the association has discretion and may
exercise reasonable business judgment to determine the means by which the
association is to provide the benefits of this part in an economical and
efficient manner.
(19)  If the association arranges or offers to provide the benefits of this
part to a covered person under a plan or arrangement that fulfills the
association's obligations under this part, the person is not entitled to
benefits from the association in addition to or other than those provided
under the plan or arrangement.
(20) (a)  Venue in a suit against the association arising under this part is
Salt Lake County.
(b)  The association may not be required to give an appeal bond in an appeal
that relates to a cause of action arising under this part.
